Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.135

License to practice specialized veterinary medicine.

(1) The department may issue a license to practice specialized veterinary medicine in this state to a veterinarian who:

(a) Submits an application on a form provided by the secretary for a license in a specialty area recognized by the board by rule;

(b) Holds a current certification as a diplomate of a national specialty board or college recognized by the board by rule in the specialty area for which application is submitted;

(c) Is not subject to license investigation, suspension, revocation, or other disciplinary action in any state, United States territory, or province of Canada;

(d) Has successfully completed an examination established by the board regarding this state's laws and rules regulating the practice of veterinary medicine; and

(e) Provides other information and verification required by the board.

(2) A veterinarian licensed to practice specialized veterinary medicine shall not practice outside his or her licensed specialty unless he or she meets licensing requirements established for practicing veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry under RCW 18.92.070 and 18.92.100.

(3) The board shall determine by rule the limits of the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry represented by a license to practice specialized veterinary medicine.

(4) The board may deny, revoke, suspend, or modify a license to practice specialized veterinary medicine if the national specialty board or college certifying the licensee denies, revokes, suspends, modifies, withdraws, or otherwise limits the certification or if the certification expires.

[ 1991 c 332 s 41.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—1991 c 332: See note following RCW 18.130.010.